Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-6216
Public member,
defined.

Public member shall mean an individual
who is not, and never was, a member of the health profession being regulated,
the spouse of a member, or an individual who does not have and never has had
a material financial interest in the health profession being
regulated or an activity directly related to the health profession being regulated.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 16;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 13.